District of Columbia statutes.
44-657

Expired

Multi-hospital systems, closure, merger, and new hospitals.

Expired.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5078, 60 DCR 12472
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 5071 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle H of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Medicaid Hospital Outpatient Supplemental Payment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5078 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5078 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).